Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-8235
Trauma system, defined.

Trauma system means an organized approach to providing care to trauma patients that provides personnel, facilities, and equipment for effective and coordinated trauma care. The trauma system shall identify facilities with specific capabilities to provide care and provide that trauma patients be treated at a designated trauma center appropriate to the patient's level of injury. Trauma system includes prevention, prehospital or out-of-hospital care, hospital care, and rehabilitative services.

Laws 1997, LB 626, § 35;

Laws 2009, LB195, § 98;

Laws 2023, LB227, § 106.